Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477C.01, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Peace officer. "Peace officer" means any person: (1) whose primary source of income derived from wages is from direct employment by a municipality as a law enforcement officer on a full-time basis of not less than 30 hours per week; (2) who has been employed for a minimum ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (i) two months before December 31 preceding the date of the current year's certification under section 477C.02, subdivision 1, by a statutory or home rule charter city, town, or county with a population of less than 5,000; new text end new text begin (ii) six months before December 31 preceding the date of the current year's certification under section 477C.02, subdivision 1, by a statutory or home rule charter city, town, or county with a population of 5,000 or more; or new text end new text begin (iii)new text end six months before December 31 preceding the date of the current year's certification under section 477C.02, subdivision 1new text begin , by a municipality that is not a statutory or home rule charter city, town, or countynew text end ; (3) who is sworn to enforce the general criminal laws of the state and local ordinances; (4) who is licensed by the Peace Officers Standards and Training Board and is authorized to arrest with a warrant; and (5) who is a member of the State Patrol retirement plan or the public employees police and fire fund. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in calendar year 2026 and thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477C.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Population. new text end new text begin "Population" has the meaning given in section 477A.011, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in calendar year 2026 and thereafter. new text end